District of Columbia statutes.
8-1841.07

Care of animal.

A commercial guard dog shall not be maintained on any premises unless the dog is provided:

(1)

Full access to an enclosed shelter sufficient to protect the dog from wind, rain, excessive heat or cold, and disease; and

(2)

Continuous access to sufficient food and water.

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 407, 55 DCR 9186